Arkansas, session 2025, SB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 10, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-10-103. State energy policy.
(a) It is the policy of this state that the state shall have an
adequate, affordable, reliable, dispatchable, secure, and resilient electric
generation and transmission system.
(b) To further the policy described in subsection (a) of this section,
the state shall seek to:
(1) Remove policy barriers to the development of a diverse
electric generation portfolio;
(2) Maintain a regulatory environment that fosters growth and
innovation sufficient to meet the state's growing demand for energy while
*ANS459*
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
contributing to the regional and national energy supply, thereby reducing
dependence on international energy sources; and
(3) Promote resources, tools, and infrastructure to enhance the
state's ability to:
(A) Respond effectively to significant disruptions to the
state's energy generation, energy delivery systems, or fuel supplies for
energy;
(B) Maintain an adequate supply of energy resources,
including without limitation proven and cost-effective dispatchable electric
generation to meet power grid demand; and
(C) Ensure the state's energy independence by removing
policy barriers to the use of energy resources generated within the state.
(c) The state shall seek to:
(1) Promote the development of a secure supply chain from
resource extraction to energy production and consumption;
(2) Maintain an environment that provides for stable consumer
prices that are as low as possible while providing producers and suppliers a
reasonable return on investment, recognizing that economic prosperity is
linked to the availability, reliability, and affordability of consumer energy
supplies; and
(3) Promote training and education programs focused on
developing a comprehensive understanding of energy, including without
limitation:
(A) Programs addressing:
(i) Energy conservation;
(ii) Energy efficiency;
(iii) Energy supply and demand; and
(iv) Energy-related workforce development; and
(B) Energy education programs in kindergarten through
grade twelve (K-12).
(d)(1) State regulatory processes regarding energy should be
streamlined to balance the economic costs of the regulation with the level of
review necessary to ensure protection of the state's various interests.
(2) When federal action regarding energy is required, the state
shall encourage expedited federal action and collaborate with United States
Government agencies to expedite review.
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
(e) A state agency is encouraged to conduct state agency activities
consistent with this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 18, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 13 — Retirement of Dispatchable Electric Generation Facilities

23-18-1301. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The long-term economic health and well-being of Arkansas
residents depends upon the availability and affordability of reliable sources
of energy;
(2) Arkansas has abundant reserves of natural gas and other
natural resources;
(3) The current economy and future economic development of
Arkansas requires reliable, resilient, dispatchable, secure, and abundant
supplies of electrical power;
(4) The demand for reliable, resilient, dispatchable electrical
power is anticipated to significantly increase in the coming decades as
Arkansas becomes home to additional manufacturing and other economic
development projects that increase demand for electrical power;
(5) It is in the interest of this state that it be able to
generate sufficient electricity within its borders to serve its own
industrial, residential, and commercial demand and to power the state's own
economy;
(6) The electrification of the United States' economy combined
with unprecedented federal regulatory pressures have created an electric
generation resource crisis;
(7) Existing state and federal policies with respect to energy
do not adequately address the concerns of the General Assembly or Arkansas
residents such that a comprehensive state energy policy is required;
(8) Current policies at the state and federal level do not
adequately assess capacity, availability, reliability, or resilience of
existing and new dispatchable, nuclear, or other emerging electric generating
resources;
(9) Retirement of dispatchable electric generating resources is
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
not necessary for the protection of the environment or the health, safety,
and welfare of the residents of this state;
(10) The health, happiness, safety, economic opportunity, and
general welfare of Arkansas residents will be promoted and protected by the
operation of dispatchable electric generating resources and, conversely,
those interests would be harmed by the premature retirement of those
generating resources;
(11) Arkansas can support a multitude of potential electric
generating resources and energy fuel supply sources so as to be a national
leader in the production of energy in all forms;
(12) Local economic development is essential to the health,
happiness, safety, and general welfare of the residents of this state; and
(13) Local economic development requires an adequate supply of
electricity to support new and expanding industries and is enhanced by robust
employment at electric generating facilities, the local job multiplier effect
of employment in the natural gas and electric generating industries, and
state and local taxes and other forms of economic value creation for this
state.

23-18-1302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Dispatchable” means a source of electrical power generation
or biomass energy that is:
(A) Available on demand;
(B) Not intermittent; and
(C) Can either:
(i) Be adjusted to increase or decrease its power
output upon request of a power grid operator or otherwise upon demand or
request of a power grid operator; or
(ii) Have its power output adjusted in response to
market or system needs;
(2) "Dispatchable electric generation facility" means a facility
that uses water, coal, natural gas, geothermal, biomass, or nuclear power, or
a combination of equivalent fuels and technologies to generate dispatchable,
reliable electricity to provide to end users;
(3) "Electric generation asset" means a plant, facility,
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
equipment, or system that converts nonelectrical energy into electricity;
(4) "Intermittent" means:
(A) A source of electrical power generation from a solar
photovoltaic, solar thermal heating, concentrating solar thermal collector,
or other solar energy collection or generation system;
(B) A source of electrical power that generates energy by
harnessing wind power or energy, whether through a turbine or other device;
(C) Anaerobic digestion or combined heat and power from
solar, wind, or anaerobic digestion sources;
(D) Any short-duration energy storage, which includes any
method of storing generated electricity for later dispatch to the power grid,
whether alone or in conjunction with any other intermittent sources described
in this subdivision (4), that is equivalent to less than forty-eight (48)
hours of the average peak generation of the unit the short-duration energy
storage is used to offset; and
(E) Conventional hydropower and pumped storage hydropower,
unless they are capable of providing energy on demand, in which case they
shall be deemed to be dispatchable;
(5) “Public utility” means the same as defined in § 23-1-101;
(6) "Reliability" means having adequate dispatchable electric
generation capacity to safely deliver electrical energy in the quantity, with
the quality, and at a time that public utility customers demand;
(7) "Resilience" means having the ability to quickly and
effectively respond to and recover from events that compromise power grid
reliability;
(8) "Retirement" means the closure or the complete and permanent
cessation of operations of a dispatchable electric generation facility; and
(9) "Secure" means to harden to a reasonable extent against an
attack, including a cyberattack or a kinetic attack, or an extreme weather
event.

23-18-1303. Retirement of dispatchable electric generation facilities.
(a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
Arkansas Public Service Commission may approve or deny the retirement of a
dispatchable electric generation facility owned by a public utility.
(2) Before retiring a dispatchable electric generation facility,
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
a public utility shall:
(A) Apply to the commission for an order approving the
retirement; and
(B) Give the commission thirty-days' notice of the
application.
(3) The application shall include a statement certifying the
applicant's compliance with the requirements of this subchapter.
(4) The commission shall enter an order within one hundred
eighty (180) days of receiving an administratively complete application to
approve the application for retirement to:
(A) Approve the application for retirement;
(B) Approve the application for retirement with
conditions; or
(C) Deny the application for retirement.
(b)(1) There is a rebuttable presumption against the retirement of a
dispatchable electric generation facility.
(2) The commission shall not approve the retirement of a
dispatchable electric generation facility, authorize a surcharge for the
decommissioning of the dispatchable electric generation facility, or take any
other action that authorizes or allows for the recovery of costs for the
retirement of a dispatchable electric generation facility, including without
limitation any stranded asset recovery, unless the presumption under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section is rebutted by evidence sufficient for the
commission to find that the retirement is in the public interest, including
without limitation evidence that:
(A) The public utility will replace the retired
dispatchable electric generation facility with new electric generation assets
that:
(i) Are dispatchable by either the public utility or
the regional transmission organization or independent system operator
responsible for balancing load within the public utility's service area;
(ii) Maintain or improve the reliability and
resilience of the power grid;
(iii) Maintain the minimum reserve capacity
requirement established by the public utility's reliability coordinator; and
(iv) Have the same or higher capacity value and net
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
capability, unless the public utility can demonstrate that the capacity value
and net capability is not necessary to provide reliable service;
(B) The retirement will not harm the public utility's
ratepayers by causing the public utility to incur any net incremental costs
to be recovered from ratepayers that could be avoided by continuing to
operate the dispatchable electric generation facility proposed for retirement
in compliance with applicable law;
(C) The decision to retire the dispatchable electric
generation facility is not the result of any financial incentives or benefits
offered by a United States Government agency; and
(D) The public utility will not commence retirement or
decommissioning of the electric generating unit until the replacement
generating capacity meeting the requirements of subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this
section is fully constructed, permitted, and in operation, unless the public
utility can demonstrate that it is necessary under the circumstances to
commence retirement or decommissioning of the existing electric generating
unit earlier.
(c) At a minimum, the public utility shall provide the commission with
evidence of all known direct and indirect costs of retiring the dispatchable
electric generation facility and demonstrate that cost savings will result to
customers as a result of the retirement of the dispatchable electric
generation facility.
(d)(1) Under the commission's report under § 23-18-1104, the
commission shall prepare and submit an annual supplemental report to the
Joint Committee on Energy no later than December 1 of each year in which the
commission issues an order on an application under this subchapter.
(2) The annual supplemental report required under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section shall include:
(A) The number of applications by public utilities to
retire dispatchable electric generation facilities, the nameplate capacity of
each of the dispatchable electric generation facilities, and whether the
application was approved, approved with conditions, or denied;
(B) The impact of any commission-approved retirement or
retirement with conditions of a dispatchable electric generation facility on
the:
(i) State's electric generation fuel mix;
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596
(ii) Required capacity reserve margins for the
public utility;
(iii) Need for capacity additions or expansions at
new or existing facilities as a result of the retirement; and
(iv) Need for additional purchase power or capacity
reserve arrangements; and
(C) Whether or not the retirement or retirement with
conditions resulted in stranded costs for the ratepayer that will be
recovered by the public utility through a surcharge or some other separate
charge on the ratepayer's bill.
(e) This section is applicable to a dispatchable electric generation
facility that is one hundred megawatts (100 MW) or larger located in
Arkansas.
(f) This subchapter does not apply to the retirement or repowering of
a dispatchable electric generation facility under any settlement, consent
decree, or other resolution of any litigation or legal proceeding executed or
ordered before the effective date of this subchapter.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the continued unabated
retirement of needed electric generating resources threatens to harm
employment, tax revenue, and utility rates and is creating a crisis with
respect to the state's ability to meet current and projected future energy
demands; that this act will manage the retirement of needed electric
generating resources for this state; and that this act is immediately
necessary because continued electric generating resources are necessary for
employment, tax revenue, and regular utility rates. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.
04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/14/25 SB596

/s/M. McKee


































04-14-2025 19:32:40 ANS459